Washington statutes.
RCW 15.86.120

Transitional product—Standards—Fees—Evaluations to verify compliance.

(1) To be labeled, sold, or represented as transitional products, agricultural products must comply with transitional product standards specified in this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, including no application of substances prohibited under the national organic program within one year immediately preceding harvest.

(2) A producer, processor, or handler may not represent, sell, or offer for sale any agricultural product as a transitional product if the producer, processor, or handler knows or has reason to know that the product does not comply with transitional product standards specified in this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(3)(a) The department may set and collect transitional certification fees, including fees for application for transitional certification, renewal of transitional certification, inspections, and sampling. Collected fees are subject to provisions specified in RCW 15.86.070.

(b) The fee for application for transitional certification is fifty dollars per site in addition to any organic certification application fees established under this chapter. The department may increase this fee by rule as necessary to cover costs of provision of services.

(4) The department may conduct evaluations in retail establishments to verify compliance with transitional labeling and advertising requirements of this chapter, rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, and the national organic program.

[ 2010 c 109 s 8.]